Florida, session 2026, SB1454.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âPresent subsections (6) through (9) of section 14 784.048, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (7) 15 through (10), respectively, and a new subsection (6) is added to 16 that section, to read: 17 784.048âStalking; definitions; penalties.â 18 (6)âA person commits the offense of aggravated stalking, a 19 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 20 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if he or she willfully, 21 maliciously, and repeatedly follows, harasses, or cyberstalks 22 another person, and in the course of such conduct commits any of 23 the following acts: 24 (a)âEnters onto the property of the other person without 25 consent, or interferes with the other personâs property, 26 including, but not limited to, tampering with or disabling 27 security or surveillance devices. 28 (b)âCommits a lewd or lascivious act, including, but not 29 limited to, the exposure of his or her genitals, masturbation, 30 or other sexually explicit conduct, in the presence of or 31 directed toward the other person or the other personâs property. 32 (c)âMails, delivers, causes to be delivered, or otherwise 33 transmits to the other person unsolicited sexually explicit 34 material with the intent to harass, degrade, or intimidate. 35 Section 2.âParagraph (g) of subsection (3) of section 36 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 37 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 38 chart.â 39 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 40 (g)âLEVEL 7 41 42 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 43 316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death, failure to stop; leaving scene. 44 316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily injury. 45 316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury or death to another person; driving at high speed or with wanton disregard for safety while fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer who is in a patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 46 327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious bodily injury. 47 402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and negligence or intentional act resulting in great bodily harm, permanent disfiguration, permanent disability, or death. 48 409.920â(2)(b)1.a. 3rd Medicaid provider fraud; $10,000 or less. 49 409.920â(2)(b)1.b. 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more than $10,000, but less than $50,000. 50 456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care profession without a license. 51 456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care profession without a license which results in serious bodily injury. 52 458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a license. 53 459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine without a license. 54 460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic medicine without a license. 55 461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine without a license. 56 462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathy without a license. 57 463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a license. 58 464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a license. 59 465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a license. 60 466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene without a license. 61 467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a license. 62 468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care services without a license. 63 483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical laboratory personnel without a license. 64 483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics without a license. 65 484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical devices without a prescription. 66 484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without a license. 67 494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of chapter 494 in which the total money and property unlawfully obtained exceeded $50,000 and there were five or more victims. 68 560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or payment instruments exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 by a money services business. 69 560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by unauthorized person, currency or payment instruments exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 70 655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 by financial institution. 71 775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to register; failure to renew driver license or identification card; other registration violations. 72 775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where children regularly congregate. 73 775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual predator; harbor or conceal a sexual predator. 74 782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a person by a person other than the perpetrator or the perpetrator of an attempted felony. 75 782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the act, procurement, or culpable negligence of another (manslaughter). 76 782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or unborn child by the operation of a motor vehicle in a reckless manner (vehicular homicide). 77 782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the operation of a vessel in a reckless manner (vessel homicide). 78 784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery; intentionally causing great bodily harm or disfigurement. 79 784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using deadly weapon. 80 784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator aware victim pregnant. 81 784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation of injunction or court order. 82 784.048(8)784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation of court order. 83 784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law enforcement officer. 84 784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually violent predators facility staff. 85 784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person 65 years of age or older. 86 784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified official or employee. 87 784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 88 784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code inspector. 89 787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child; second or subsequent offense. 90 787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with a specified prior conviction. 91 787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services of an adult. 92 787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services by the transfer or transport of an adult from outside Florida to within the state. 93 790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation subsequent to previous conviction of s. 790.07(1) or (2). 94 790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun under specified circumstances. 95 790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or deliver hoax bomb. 96 790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or threatening to use any hoax bomb while committing or attempting to commit a felony. 97 790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or attempting to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction. 98 790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or threatening to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction while committing or attempting to commit a felony. 99 790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a person who qualifies for the penalty enhancements provided for in s. 874.04. 100 794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation; consent by a parent, guardian, or a person in custodial authority to a victim younger than 18 years of age. 101 796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a prostitute; 2nd offense. 102 796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a prostitute; 3rd and subsequent offense. 103 800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim younger than 12 years of age; offender younger than 18 years of age. 104 800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 16 years of age; offender 18 years of age or older. 105 800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 16 years; offender 18 years or older; prior conviction for specified sex offense. 106 806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by fire or explosive. 107 810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling; unarmed; no assault or battery. 108 810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied dwelling; unarmed; no assault or battery. 109 810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied conveyance; unarmed; no assault or battery. 110 810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized emergency vehicle. 111 812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at $100,000 or more or a semitrailer deployed by a law enforcement officer; property stolen while causing other property damage; 1st degree grand theft. 112 812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued at less than $50,000, grand theft in 2nd degree. 113 812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency medical equipment; 2nd degree grand theft. 114 812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law enforcement equipment from authorized emergency vehicle. 115 812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree; firearm with previous conviction of s. 812.014(2)(c)5. 116 812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $50,000 or more. 117 812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates, organizes, plans, etc., the theft of property and traffics in stolen property. 118 812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching. 119 812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly weapon, or other weapon. 120 817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value greater than $50,000. 121 817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle accident victims with intent to defraud. 122 817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or participating in an intentional motor vehicle collision. 123 817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value $100,000 or more. 124 817.2341â(2)(b) & (3)(b) 1st Making false entries of material fact or false statements regarding property values relating to the solvency of an insuring entity which are a significant cause of the insolvency of that entity. 125 817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or advertising personal protective equipment with intent to defraud. 126 817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a vaccine with intent to defraud. 127 817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other unauthorized document. 128 817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49 counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 129 825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or disabled adult causing great bodily harm, disability, or disfigurement. 130 825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or disabled adult and property is valued at $10,000 or more, but less than $50,000. 131 827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing great bodily harm, disability, or disfigurement. 132 827.04(3) 3rd Impregnation of a child under 16 years of age by person 21 years of age or older. 133 827.071(2) & (3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a sexual performance, or promote or direct such performance. 134 827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes child pornography. 135 837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about alleged capital felony to a law enforcement officer. 136 838.015 2nd Bribery. 137 838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward for official behavior. 138 838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public servant. 139 838.22 2nd Bid tampering. 140 843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public officer or employee. 141 843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal process. 142 843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public officer or employee. 143 847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a computer service, to commit an unlawful sex act. 144 847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to commit an unlawful sex act. 145 872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body. 146 874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting person under 13 to join a criminal gang; second or subsequent offense. 147 874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes, plans, finances, directs, manages, or supervises criminal gang-related activity. 148 893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.) within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, school, or state, county, or municipal park or publicly owned recreational facility or community center. 149 893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5., within 1,000 feet of property used for religious services or a specified business site. 150 893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substance. 151 893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more than 25 lbs., less than 2,000 lbs. 152 893.135â(1)(b)1.a. 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more than 28 grams, less than 200 grams. 153 893.135â(1)(c)1.a. 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs, more than 4 grams, less than 14 grams. 154 893.135â(1)(c)2.a. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28 grams or more, less than 50 grams. 155 893.135â(1)(c)2.b. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 156 893.135â(1)(c)3.a. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 157 893.135â(1)(c)3.b. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14 grams or more, less than 25 grams. 158 893.135â(1)(c)4.b.(I) 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 159 893.135â(1)(d)1.a. 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine, 28 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 160 893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone, 200 grams or more, less than 5 kilograms. 161 893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14 grams or more, less than 28 grams. 162 893.135â(1)(g)1.a. 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 163 893.135â(1)(h)1.a. 1st Trafficking in gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1 kilogram or more, less than 5 kilograms. 164 893.135â(1)(j)1.a. 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol, 1 kilogram or more, less than 5 kilograms. 165 893.135â(1)(k)2.a. 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines, 10 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 166 893.135â(1)(m)2.a. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 280 grams or more, less than 500 grams. 167 893.135â(1)(m)2.b. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 500 grams or more, less than 1,000 grams. 168 893.135â(1)(n)2.a. 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl phenethylamines, 14 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 169 893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for trafficking in or manufacturing of controlled substance. 170 896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 171 896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to evade reporting or registration requirements, financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 172 943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating permanent residence; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 173 943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in state after indicating intent to leave; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 174 943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 175 943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 176 943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 177 944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 178 944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to submit to the taking of a digitized photograph. 179 944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 180 944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 181 985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to submit to the taking of a digitized photograph. 182 985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 183 985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 184 Section 3.âParagraph (c) of subsection (8) of section 185 948.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 186 948.06âViolation of probation or community control; 187 revocation; modification; continuance; failure to pay 188 restitution or cost of supervision.â 189 (8) 190 (c)âFor purposes of this section, the term âqualifying 191 offenseâ means any of the following: 192 1.âKidnapping or attempted kidnapping under s. 787.01, 193 false imprisonment of a child under the age of 13 under s. 194 787.02(3), or luring or enticing a child under s. 787.025(2)(b) 195 or (c). 196 2.âMurder or attempted murder under s. 782.04, attempted 197 felony murder under s. 782.051, or manslaughter under s. 782.07. 198 3.âAggravated battery or attempted aggravated battery under 199 s. 784.045. 200 4.âSexual battery or attempted sexual battery under s. 201 794.011(2), (3), (4), or (8)(b) or (c). 202 5.âLewd or lascivious battery or attempted lewd or 203 lascivious battery under s. 800.04(4), lewd or lascivious 204 molestation under s. 800.04(5)(b) or (c)2., lewd or lascivious 205 conduct under s. 800.04(6)(b), lewd or lascivious exhibition 206 under s. 800.04(7)(b), or lewd or lascivious exhibition on 207 computer under s. 847.0135(5)(b). 208 6.âRobbery or attempted robbery under s. 812.13, carjacking 209 or attempted carjacking under s. 812.133, or home invasion 210 robbery or attempted home invasion robbery under s. 812.135. 211 7.âLewd or lascivious offense upon or in the presence of an 212 elderly or disabled person or attempted lewd or lascivious 213 offense upon or in the presence of an elderly or disabled person 214 under s. 825.1025. 215 8.âSexual performance by a child or attempted sexual 216 performance by a child under s. 827.071. 217 9.âComputer pornography under s. 847.0135(2) or (3), 218 transmission of child pornography under s. 847.0137, or selling 219 or buying of minors under s. 847.0145. 220 10.âPoisoning food or water under s. 859.01. 221 11.âAbuse of a dead human body under s. 872.06. 222 12.âAny burglary offense or attempted burglary offense that 223 is either a first degree felony or second degree felony under s. 224 810.02(2) or (3). 225 13.âArson or attempted arson under s. 806.01(1). 226 14.âAggravated assault under s. 784.021. 227 15.âAggravated stalking under s. 784.048(3), (4), (5), or 228 (8) s. 784.048(3), (4), (5), or (7). 229 16.âAircraft piracy under s. 860.16. 230 17.âUnlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a 231 destructive device or bomb under s. 790.161(2), (3), or (4). 232 18.âTreason under s. 876.32. 233 19.âAny offense committed in another jurisdiction which 234 would be an offense listed in this paragraph if that offense had 235 been committed in this state. 236 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.